Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2325
Appeal of sentence by prosecutor; defendant's right to appeal not affected.

Nothing contained in sections 29-2320 to 29-2325 shall affect the right of the defendant to appeal the conviction and sentence, as otherwise provided by law.

Laws 1982, LB 402, § 6.